lexc/noun/enhutuz.lexc
!!!enhuoa.-> enhuoaee .lexc!!!
!               UeuetoueAcc3      .o. # ű
!               UetoueueFgg3      .o. 
!               UeuetouePP3       .o. 
! ű -> ü
!
Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§uue§ §J§ §UUE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §AE1§ §k§
§VV§ §oeoez5§ §OEOE4§
§OEOE3§ §oeoez4§  §EOA1§ §ooez4§ §oeoez31§
§tuze§
      
LEXICON Root
Noun ;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;


! fűz, tűz, szűz oaee és oe keveréke
LEXICON Noun
Vesta-szűz AddNoun;
acélszűz AddNoun;
aggszűz AddNoun;
aknatűz AddNoun;
alagúttűz AddNoun;
aljzattűz AddNoun;
alomtűz AddNoun;
anyaszűz AddNoun;
apácaszűz AddNoun;
aranyfűz AddNoun;
aranyszűz AddNoun;
asszonytűz AddNoun;
autóbusztűz AddNoun;
autótűz AddNoun;
avartűz AddNoun;
babérfűz AddNoun;
bambuszsortűz AddNoun;
barakktűz AddNoun;
bengálitűz AddNoun;
benzintűz AddNoun;
berektűz AddNoun;
bográcstűz AddNoun;
bokorfűz AddNoun;
bokortűz AddNoun;
bolygótűz AddNoun;
bombatűz AddNoun;
borjúszűz AddNoun;
bortűz AddNoun;
botolófűz AddNoun;
bozótfűz AddNoun;
bozóttűz AddNoun;
buditűz AddNoun;
bálatűz AddNoun;
bányatűz AddNoun;
bíbortűz AddNoun;
bölcsességtűz AddNoun;
búzakévetűz AddNoun;
cinegefűz AddNoun;
csatártűz AddNoun;
csavarfűz AddNoun;
csendőrsortűz AddNoun;
cserkésztábortűz AddNoun;
csigolyafűz AddNoun;
csillámtűz AddNoun;
csipkebokortűz AddNoun;
csűrtűz AddNoun;
céltűz AddNoun;
deszkatűz AddNoun;
diadaltűz AddNoun;
démontűz AddNoun;
díszsortűz AddNoun;
dísztűz AddNoun;
egyestűz AddNoun;
egységtűz AddNoun;
elhárítótűz AddNoun;
emléktűz AddNoun;
erdőtűz AddNoun;
erkélytűz AddNoun;
erődtűz AddNoun;
ezüstfűz AddNoun;
faháztűz AddNoun;
falutűz AddNoun;
faszéntűz AddNoun;
fedezőtűz AddNoun;
fedélzettűz AddNoun;
fegyvertűz AddNoun;
fehérfűz AddNoun;
felülettűz AddNoun;
fenyőfatűz AddNoun;
folyadéktűz AddNoun;
fonófűz AddNoun;
foszfortűz AddNoun;
futótűz AddNoun;
fáklyatűz AddNoun;
fárosztűz AddNoun;
félszűz AddNoun;
fémtűz AddNoun;
fényszórótűz AddNoun;
férfiszűz AddNoun;
fúriafűz AddNoun;
füstölőtűz AddNoun;
főzőtűz AddNoun;
fűz AddNoun;
galagonyatűz AddNoun;
garázstűz AddNoun;
grafittűz AddNoun;
gránáttűz AddNoun;
gumiabroncstűz AddNoun;
gumitűz AddNoun;
gyalogfűz AddNoun;
gyehennatűz AddNoun;
gyeptűz AddNoun;
gyertyatűz AddNoun;
gyomortűz AddNoun;
gyorstűz AddNoun;
gyászfűz AddNoun;
gyásztűz AddNoun;
gyújtótűz AddNoun;
gázpalacktűz AddNoun;
gáztűz AddNoun;
gépfegyvertűz AddNoun;
gépjárműtűz AddNoun;
gépkocsitűz AddNoun;
géppuskatűz AddNoun;
géptértűz AddNoun;
gépágyútűz AddNoun;
görögtűz AddNoun;
hajnaltűz AddNoun;
hajtóműtűz AddNoun;
hajótűz AddNoun;
hangártűz AddNoun;
holdfénytűz AddNoun;
holdszűz AddNoun;
honfitűz AddNoun;
hoteltűz AddNoun;
hámortűz AddNoun;
háttértűz AddNoun;
háztűz AddNoun;
indiántűz AddNoun;
irodatűz AddNoun;
istállótűz AddNoun;
jeltűz AddNoun;
jelzőtűz AddNoun;
járműtűz AddNoun;
kabintűz AddNoun;
kandallótűz AddNoun;
kandelábertűz AddNoun;
kartácstűz AddNoun;
karácsonyfatűz AddNoun;
kastélytűz AddNoun;
katasztrófatűz AddNoun;
kazaltűz AddNoun;
kazántűz AddNoun;
kecskefűz AddNoun;
kemencetűz AddNoun;
kereszttűz AddNoun;
kerozintűz AddNoun;
kirakatbábutűz AddNoun;
kocsitűz AddNoun;
kohótűz AddNoun;
koksztűz AddNoun;
kollégiumtűz AddNoun;
kolostorszűz AddNoun;
kombájntűz AddNoun;
komputertűz AddNoun;
konyhatűz AddNoun;
kosárfonófűz AddNoun;
kosárfűz AddNoun;
kovácstűz AddNoun;
kukatűz AddNoun;
kupolatűz AddNoun;
kábeltűz AddNoun;
kályhatűz AddNoun;
kéménytűz AddNoun;
kéntűz AddNoun;
kézifegyvertűz AddNoun;
kígyótűz AddNoun;
kórháztűz AddNoun;
körgyűrűtűz AddNoun;
körtűz AddNoun;
kúttűz AddNoun;
kőtűz AddNoun;
lakástűz AddNoun;
lakóháztűz AddNoun;
legelőtűz AddNoun;
leánytűz AddNoun;
lidérctűz AddNoun;
lábtörlőtűz AddNoun;
lángtűz AddNoun;
láptűz AddNoun;
lármatűz AddNoun;
légréstűz AddNoun;
lótűz AddNoun;
lövegtűz AddNoun;
lőfegyvertűz AddNoun;
malomtűz AddNoun;
mandulafűz AddNoun;
melléképülettűz AddNoun;
mesefűz AddNoun;
mesetűz AddNoun;
meteorittűz AddNoun;
meteortűz AddNoun;
metrótűz AddNoun;
mezőtűz AddNoun;
mocsárfűz AddNoun;
motortűz AddNoun;
mozitűz AddNoun;
mozsártűz AddNoun;
munkatűz AddNoun;
máglyatűz AddNoun;
májtűz AddNoun;
múzeumtűz AddNoun;
műhelytűz AddNoun;
műtábortűz AddNoun;
műtűz AddNoun;
naftatűz AddNoun;
naptűz AddNoun;
narancstűz AddNoun;
neontűz AddNoun;
nyoszolyószűz AddNoun;
nádastűz AddNoun;
nádtetőtűz AddNoun;
nádtűz AddNoun;
olajfűz AddNoun;
olajtűz AddNoun;
oldalsortűz AddNoun;
oldaltűz AddNoun;
oltártűz AddNoun;
olvasztótűz AddNoun;
orvlövésztűz AddNoun;
ostromtűz AddNoun;
padlástűz AddNoun;
palacktűz AddNoun;
palotatűz AddNoun;
panelháztűz AddNoun;
paradicsomsortűz AddNoun;
parlagtűz AddNoun;
parázstűz AddNoun;
pergőtűz AddNoun;
petárdatűz AddNoun;
pincetűz AddNoun;
plazmasortűz AddNoun;
plazmatűz AddNoun;
pokoltűz AddNoun;
ponttűz AddNoun;
poétatűz AddNoun;
préritűz AddNoun;
próbatűz AddNoun;
puskatűz AddNoun;
pusztatűz AddNoun;
pásztatűz AddNoun;
pásztortűz AddNoun;
rajtűz AddNoun;
rajössztűz AddNoun;
rakománytűz AddNoun;
raktártűz AddNoun;
rakétasortűz AddNoun;
rakétatűz AddNoun;
rekettyefűz AddNoun;
reménytűz AddNoun;
repülőgéptűz AddNoun;
riadótűz AddNoun;
rőzsetűz AddNoun;
sajtóössztűz AddNoun;
serevényfűz AddNoun;
sertésszűz AddNoun;
sorozattűz AddNoun;
sortűz AddNoun;
spirálfűz AddNoun;
sportcsarnoktűz AddNoun;
srapneltűz AddNoun;
sufnitűz AddNoun;
szabadtűz AddNoun;
szakálltűz AddNoun;
szalmakazaltűz AddNoun;
szalmatűz AddNoun;
szaunatűz AddNoun;
szavannatűz AddNoun;
szellemtűz AddNoun;
szemtűz AddNoun;
szentszűz AddNoun;
szikratűz AddNoun;
szivartűz AddNoun;
szobatűz AddNoun;
szomorúfűz AddNoun;
szondatűz AddNoun;
sztyeppetűz AddNoun;
sztyepptűz AddNoun;
szuroktűz AddNoun;
szállodatűz AddNoun;
szállástűz AddNoun;
számítógéptűz AddNoun;
szárnytűz AddNoun;
szárítótűz AddNoun;
szénhidrogéntűz AddNoun;
széntűz AddNoun;
színháztűz AddNoun;
szórótűz AddNoun;
szűz AddNoun;
szűztűz AddNoun;
sárfűz AddNoun;
söréttűz AddNoun;
tajgatűz AddNoun;
talajtűz AddNoun;
tanyatűz AddNoun;
taplótűz AddNoun;
tarlótűz AddNoun;
tartálytűz AddNoun;
teherautótűz AddNoun;
templomszűz AddNoun;
templomtűz AddNoun;
tengeralattjárótűz AddNoun;
termittűz AddNoun;
terrorsortűz AddNoun;
területtűz AddNoun;
testvértűz AddNoun;
tetőtűz AddNoun;
tisztítótűz AddNoun;
torkolattűz AddNoun;
toronyháztűz AddNoun;
torpedótűz AddNoun;
torpedóössztűz AddNoun;
trágyatűz AddNoun;
táborszűz AddNoun;
tábortűz AddNoun;
tálcatűz AddNoun;
törmeléktűz AddNoun;
törpefűz AddNoun;
tőzegtűz AddNoun;
tűz AddNoun;
vadfűz AddNoun;
vadontűz AddNoun;
vadásztűz AddNoun;
vaktűz AddNoun;
varázstűz AddNoun;
vasszűz AddNoun;
vesszőfűz AddNoun;
villámtűz AddNoun;
világszűz AddNoun;
virrasztótűz AddNoun;
viskótűz AddNoun;
vonattűz AddNoun;
vulkántűz AddNoun;
vágytűz AddNoun;
vándortűz AddNoun;
várostűz AddNoun;
védőtűz AddNoun;
vértanúszűz AddNoun;
vértűz AddNoun;
zavarótűz AddNoun;
zsinagógatűz AddNoun;
zárdaszűz AddNoun;
zárótűz AddNoun;
ágyútűz AddNoun;
áruháztűz AddNoun;
épülettűz AddNoun;
örömtűz AddNoun;
össztűz AddNoun;
ötlettűz AddNoun;
üdvözlőtűz AddNoun;
ütegsortűz AddNoun;
ütegtűz AddNoun;
üzemanyagtűz AddNoun;
őrtűz AddNoun;
ősfűz AddNoun;
őstűz AddNoun;
űrállomástűz AddNoun;


LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Gen1;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez4§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA1§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t        #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc[lfea]:^+cnAcc^t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4§t§OEOE3§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                                  Gen1;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez5§k    Gen;
                            Case1;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen1;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;

LEXICON Gen1
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case1;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez4§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez31§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Case1
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^et     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§tuze§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez31§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor
